Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-947
Cemetery association; formation; funds; transfer to.

Upon the organization of a cemetery association as provided in section 17-944, all property and money under the control of the city council or village board of trustees shall vest in such cemetery association for the purposes provided for in sections 17-926 to 17-947, and all money in the control of such city council or village board of trustees shall be turned over to the board of trustees of such cemetery association.

Laws 1887, c. 15, § 6, p. 332;

R.S.1913, § 5176;

C.S.1922, § 4363;

C.S.1929, § 17-561;

R.S.1943, § 17-947;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 279.